District of Columbia statutes.
44-1051.09

Publication of license status.

The Department may make available to the public a roster of all nurse staffing agencies that are or have been licensed by it. The information published may include the name, address, and telephone number of the agency, as well as the agency’s current licensure status.

History

March 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-74, § 9, 50 DCR 10914